Maryland, session 2025, HB0384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
7–114.
(a) (1) The Department is the principal unit of State government responsible
for developing, maintaining, revising, and enforcing statewide disability policies and
standards throughout the units of State government.
(2) In this capacity, the Department shall:
(i) serve as the principal advisor to the Governor on the means and
methods available to:
1. implement and fund support to individuals with
disabilities in accordance with the State Disabilities Plan;
2. modify or consolidate support to individuals with
disabilities; and
3. collaborate with federal, regional, and local units of
government to enhance the effectiveness of the provision and funding of support to
individuals with disabilities;
(ii) annually recommend projects to the Department of Budget and
Management for inclusion in the capital budget to promote access to State–owned facilities
for individuals with disabilities;
(iii) assist units of State government to identify federal, State, local,
and private funds available to the State for programs and services for individuals with
disabilities; and
(iv) provide technical assistance to local jurisdictions in planning and
implementing collaborative strategies consistent with the State Disabilities Plan.

HOUSE BILL 384 3
(b) The Department shall oversee and administer the following programs and
units:
(1) constituent services and ombudsmen programs;
(2) the Assistive Technology Guaranteed Loan Program under Subtitle 6
of this title;
(3) the Office of Personal Assistance Services, including the Attendant
Care Program under Subtitle 4 of this title;
(4) Telecommunications Access of Maryland under Subtitle 8 of this title;
[and]
(5) Telecommunications Devices and Distribution of Accessible
Information for Disabled Individuals under Subtitle 9 of this title; AND
(6) THE MARYLAND DISABILITY SERVICE ANIMAL PROGRAM UNDER
SUBTITLE 12 OF THIS TITLE.
SUBTITLE 12. MARYLAND DISABILITY SERVICE ANIMAL PROGRAM.
7–1201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF DISABILITIES.
(C) “ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL A RESIDENT OF THE
STATE WITH A DISABILITY, AS DEFINED IN THE FEDERAL AMERICANS WITH
DISABILITIES ACT OF 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12102.
(D) “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND DISABILITY SERVICE ANIMAL
PROGRAM FUND.
(E) “NONPROFIT TRAINING ENTITY” MEANS A CORPORATION, A
FOUNDATION, OR ANY OTHER LEGAL ENTITY THAT:
(1) IS TAX–EXEMPT UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE
CODE;
(2) ENGAGES IN THE TRAINING OF SERVICE ANIMALS FOR USE BY
ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS; AND

HOUSE BILL 384
(3) HAS BEEN SELECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO PROVIDE
SERVICES UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE MARYLAND DISABILITY SERVICE ANIMAL
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(G) “PROGRAM PARTICIPANT” MEANS AN ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL WHO
PARTICIPATES IN THE PROGRAM.
(H) (1) “SERVICE ANIMAL” MEANS AN ANIMAL THAT IS INDIVIDUALLY
TRAINED TO DO WORK OR PERFORM TASKS FOR THE BENEFIT OF AN INDIVIDUAL
WITH A DISABILITY.
(2) “SERVICE ANIMAL” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN ANIMAL THAT:
(I) AS A RESULT OF THE ANIMAL’S PRESENCE, IS MEANT TO
DETER CRIME; OR
(II) PROVIDES ONLY EMOTIONAL SUPPORT, WELL–BEING,
COMFORT, OR COMPANIONSHIP TO AN INDIVIDUAL.
(I) “SUCCESSFUL PROGRAM PARTICIPANT” MEANS A PROGRAM
PARTICIPANT WHO SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETES THE TRAINING PROTOCOL
SPECIFIED BY A NONPROFIT TRAINING ENTITY.
7–1202.
THERE IS A MARYLAND DISABILITY SERVICE ANIMAL PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
7–1203.
THE PURPOSES OF THE PROGRAM ARE TO:
(1) REFER ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS WHO INQUIRE ABOUT
PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM TO SELECT ONE OR MORE NONPROFIT TRAINING
ENTITIES TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM; AND
(2) PROVIDE ADDITIONAL FUNDING MECHANISMS TO ASSIST
ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS IN THE PROGRAM; AND

HOUSE BILL 384 5
(3) ENCOURAGE SUCCESSFUL PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS TO ASSIST IN
OUTREACH AND REFERRALS TO OTHER ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS WHO COULD
BENEFIT FROM PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM.
7–1204.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) MANAGE, SUPERVISE, AND ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM;
(2) ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THE PROGRAM AND TO
ENSURE THAT FUND RESOURCES ARE UTILIZED TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF
THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING PROCEDURES FOR THE
DEPARTMENT TO:
(I) PROMOTE THE PROGRAM TO ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS
THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT’S OUTREACH METHODS;
(II) REFER ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS TO SELECTED NONPROFIT
TRAINING ENTITIES;
(III) RECEIVE DONATIONS FOR THE FUND; AND
(IV) (II) USE REVENUE FROM THE FUND TO PAY SELECTED
NONPROFIT TRAINING ENTITIES FOR SERVICES THAT ARE PROVIDED THROUGH THE
PROGRAM; AND
(3) SELECT AT LEAST ONE NONPROFIT TRAINING ENTITY TO:
(I) DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A TRAINING PROTOCOL THAT
WILL TEACH EACH PROGRAM PARTICIPANT METHODOLOGIES, STRATEGIES, AND
TECHNIQUES FOR PARTNERING WITH SERVICE ANIMALS;
(II) SELECT QUALIFIED PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS FROM THOSE
ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS REFERRED TO THE NONPROFIT TRAINING ENTITY UNDER
THE PROGRAM;
(III) SELECT AN APPROPRIATE SERVICE ANIMAL FOR EACH
PROGRAM PARTICIPANT;
(IV) FACILITATE EACH PROGRAM PARTICIPANT’S TRAINING
USING THE NONPROFIT TRAINING ENTITY’S TRAINING PROTOCOL; AND

HOUSE BILL 384
(V) PARTNER EACH SUCCESSFUL PROGRAM PARTICIPANT WITH
THE SERVICE ANIMAL ON THE PROGRAM PARTICIPANT’S SUCCESSFUL COMPLETION
OF THE NONPROFIT TRAINING ENTITY’S TRAINING PROTOCOL.
7–1205.
(A) TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR SELECTION AS A NONPROFIT TRAINING ENTITY
UNDER § 7–1204 OF THIS SUBTITLE, A NONPROFIT TRAINING ENTITY SHALL:
(1) SERVE THE NEEDS OF ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS IN THE STATE; AND
(2) GENERATE ITS OWN REVENUE AND REINVEST THE PROCEEDS OF
THAT REVENUE IN THE GROWTH AND DEVELOPMENT OF ITS PROGRAMS.
(B) A NONPROFIT TRAINING ENTITY MAY DISQUALIFY A PROGRAM
PARTICIPANT FROM PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM IF THE NONPROFIT
TRAINING ENTITY DETERMINES THAT THE PROGRAM PARTICIPANT’S INVOLVEMENT
IN THE PROGRAM:
(1) PRESENTS A DANGER TO THE PROGRAM PARTICIPANT’S MENTAL
OR PHYSICAL WELL–BEING;
(2) PRESENTS A DIRECT THREAT TO OTHERS, AS DEFINED BY THE
FEDERAL AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT;
(3) PRESENTS A DIRECT THREAT TO THE SERVICE ANIMAL’S MENTAL
OR PHYSICAL WELL–BEING; OR
(4) DOES NOT MEET THE TRAINING REQUIREMENTS OF THE
NONPROFIT.
(C) A PROGRAM PARTICIPANT MAY DISCONTINUE INVOLVEMENT IN THE
PROGRAM FOR ANY REASON.
7–1206.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND DISABILITY SERVICE ANIMAL PROGRAM FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO:
(1) PAY A NONPROFIT TRAINING ENTITY; AND
(2) COVER THE COSTS OF ADMINISTERING THE PROGRAM.

HOUSE BILL 384 7
(C) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND, AND THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) REVENUE COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN THE FORM
OF DONATIONS TO THE PROGRAM;
(II) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE
FUND; AND
(III) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED
FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(2) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $25,000 TO THE FUND.
(2) (3) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(3) (4) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO
AND IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD
BE APPROPRIATED FOR THE PROGRAM.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO PAY:
(1) A NONPROFIT TRAINING ENTITY; AND
(2) ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS OF THE PROGRAM.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST AND REINVEST THE
MONEY OF THE FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE
INVESTED.
(2) ANY INVESTMENT EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED
TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(H) FOR THE PURPOSE OF IMPLEMENTING THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY ACCEPT GIFTS OR GRANTS FOR DONATION TO THE FUND.

HOUSE BILL 384
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025:
(a) This Act is contingent on the Department of Disabilities certifying that the
Department has sufficient staff to administer the Maryland Disability Service Animal
Program under Title 7, Subtitle 12 of the Human Services Article, as enacted by Section 1
of this Act.
(b) On or before October 1, 2026, the Department of Disabilities shall notify the
Department of Legislative Services whether the Department has certified that the
Department has sufficient staff to administer the Maryland Disability Service Animal
Program.
(c) (1) If the Department of Legislative Services receives notification that the
Department of Disabilities has sufficient staff to administer the Maryland Disability
Service Animal Program on or before October 1, 2026, this Act shall take effect on the date
the notice is received by the Department of Legislative Services in accordance with
subsection (b) of this section.
(2) If the Department of Legislative Services receives notice that the
Department of Disabilities lacks sufficient staff to administer the Maryland Disability
Service Animal Program on or before October 1, 2026, this Act, with no further action
required by the General Assembly, shall be null and void.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 2 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.